Illinois, session 104th, SB3087.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Swimming Facility Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 125/7)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1207)7    Sec. 7. Conditional license. If the Department or, where 8applicable, the ordinance health department finds that the 9facilities of any swimming facility for which a license is 10sought are not in compliance with the provisions of this Act 11and the rules of the Department relating thereto, but may 12operate without undue prejudice to the public, the Department 13or the ordinance health department may issue a conditional 14license setting forth the conditions on which the license is 15issued, the manner in which the swimming facility fails to 16comply with the Act and such rules, and shall set forth the 17time, not to exceed 5 3 years, within which the applicant must 18make any changes or corrections necessary to fully comply with 19this Act and the rules of the Department relating thereto. No 20more than 5 3 such consecutive annual conditional licenses may 21be issued.22(Source: P.A. 96-1081, eff. 7-16-10; 97-957, eff. 1-1-13.)